Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.6583] INFORMED CONSENT REQUIRED FOR MEDICAL TREATMENTS THAT MAY HARM FERTILITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Family building" means construction or formation of a family, which can encompass both biological and nonbiological steps or actions taken by a person toward having children. new text end new text begin (c) "Fertility" means the ability to conceive or gestate biological children. new text end new text begin (d) "Fertility specialist" means a health care provider with expertise in reproductive health and fertility preservation. new text end new text begin (e) "Health care provider" means a health professional who is licensed or registered by the state to provide health treatment and services within the professional's scope of practice and in accordance with state law. new text end new text begin (f) "Medical treatment" means any prescription drug, procedure, therapy, or intervention administered by a health care provider that has a certain or may have a potential impact on a patient's fertility. new text end new text begin (g) "Patient" means the person receiving medical treatment. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Informed consent required. new text end new text begin A health care provider must not perform a medical treatment on a patient unless: new text end new text begin (1) the health care provider discussed with the patient certain or potential harm that the medical treatment may have on the patient's fertility; new text end new text begin (2) the health care provider provided the patient the opportunity to consult with a fertility specialist regarding the medical treatment's certain or potential impact on the patient's fertility, available fertility preservation services, and available family building options; and new text end new text begin (3) the patient provided prior written informed consent to the medical treatment affirming that the patient was informed of the medical treatment's certain or potential harm to the patient's fertility, understands the risks and implications of the medical treatment, and authorizes the medical treatment. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibited conduct by a health care provider. new text end new text begin A health care provider must not attempt to influence a patient's decision regarding medical treatment by discouraging the patient from consulting with a fertility specialist regarding fertility preservation services or family building options. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Ground for disciplinary action; complaint. new text end new text begin (a) A health care provider who violates this section is subject to disciplinary action by the health-related licensing board regulating that health care provider. new text end new text begin (b) A patient harmed by a violation of this section may file a complaint with the health-related licensing board regulating the health care provider who violated this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties of the commissioner. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must establish procedures for monitoring compliance with this section. new text end